Hawaii statutes.
[§523A-60] Answer; disposition of funds on
deposit; dismissal without prejudice. Any person, whether or not named in
the petition, may within fifteen days but not more than sixty days after the
date of the first publication of the notice respond to the petition by answer
describing the property, asserting an interest as owner or successor, and
declaring an intention to claim the same from the United States under the laws
of the United States. Such answer shall not be filed unless accompanied by the
sum of $50, and no other answer or response shall be filed by or on behalf of a
claimant. The court shall strike from the petition and dismiss from the
proceeding all property described in an answer. Such dismissal shall be
without prejudice to a subsequent petition should it appear that the claimant
is not entitled to the property, and the interest asserted in said answer shall
not thereafter be asserted against the State. The funds deposited with any
answer shall be transmitted by the court to the director and shall be received
for deposit in the general fund as total reimbursement for costs and services
expended on behalf of the claimant. [L 1988, c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next